Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin VETERANS RESILIENCE PROJECT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to the veterans resilience project. Grant money must be used to make eye movement desensitization and reprocessing therapy available to veterans, veterans' spouses, current military service members, and current military service members' spouses who are suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder and trauma. The base for this appropriation is $400,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) The veterans resilience project must report to the commissioner of veterans affairs and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance by January 15 of each year on the program. The report must include an overview of the program's budget, a detailed explanation of program expenditures, the number of veterans and service members served by the program, and a list and explanation of the services provided to program participants. new text end